Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1111
Executive director; separate accounting required; when; investment authority.

(1) During the period of time that a determination, by the board, its designee, or a court of competent jurisdiction, is being made as to whether a domestic relations order is a qualified domestic relations order, the executive director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems shall separately account for the segregated amounts.

(2) If a member of the statewide public retirement systems participates in a defined contribution account, the member shall maintain investment authority over the entire account until the order is determined to be a qualified domestic relations order, but upon such determination, the alternate payee shall receive investment authority over the alternate payee's share of the account.

(3) If within the eighteen-month period the order is determined to be a qualified domestic relations order, the executive director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems shall pay the segregated amounts plus interest to the alternate payee or payees entitled thereto.

(4) If within the eighteen-month period the order is determined not to be a qualified domestic relations order or the qualified status of the order is not resolved, the executive director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems shall pay the segregated amounts plus interest to the member or other beneficiaries entitled thereto.

(5) If the determination that the order is a qualified domestic relations order is made after the eighteen-month period, the order will be applied prospectively only.

(6) For purposes of this section, the eighteen-month period begins on the date that the first payment would be required under the domestic relations order.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 11;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 11.
July 18, 2026